Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.230

Nonapproval of conversion unless acquisition of control within three years by certain companies prohibited.

(1) No conversion may be approved by the director unless the plan of conversion provides that the converted savings bank shall enter into an agreement with the director, in form satisfactory to the director, which shall provide that for a period of three years following the conversion any company significantly engaged in an unrelated business activity, either directly or through an affiliate thereof, shall not be permitted, regardless of the form of the transaction, to acquire control of the converted savings bank. Any acquisition of a converted savings bank shall also comply with RCW 32.32.228.

(2) As used in this section:

(a) The term "affiliate" means any person or company which controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, a specified company.

(b) A person or company shall be deemed to have "control" of:

(i) A savings bank if the person directly or indirectly or acting in concert with one or more other persons, or through one or more subsidiaries, owns, controls, or holds with power to vote, or holds proxies representing, more than twenty-five percent of the voting shares of the savings bank, or controls in any manner the election of a majority of the directors of the bank;

(ii) Any other company if the person directly or indirectly or acting in concert with one or more other persons, or through one or more subsidiaries, owns, controls, or holds with power to vote, or holds proxies representing, more than twenty-five percent of the voting shares or rights of the other company, or controls in any manner the election or appointment of a majority of the directors or trustees of the other company, or is a general partner in or has contributed more than twenty-five percent of the capital of the other company;

(iii) A trust if the person is a trustee thereof; or

(iv) A savings bank or any other company if the director determines, after reasonable notice and opportunity for hearing, that the person directly or indirectly exercises a controlling influence over the management or policies of the savings bank or other company.

(c) A company shall be deemed to be "significantly engaged" in an unrelated business activity if its unrelated business activities would represent, on either an actual or a pro forma basis, more than fifteen percent of its consolidated net worth at the close of this preceding fiscal year or of its consolidated net earnings for such fiscal year.

(d) The term "unrelated business activity" means any business activity not authorized for a savings bank or any subsidiary thereof.

[ 1994 c 92 s 367; 1985 c 56 s 26; 1981 c 85 s 45.]